California, session 20252026, SB1064.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 44153 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:44153. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, testing conducted pursuant to Section 44152 shall be required not more frequently than biennially annually for all nongasoline heavy-duty onroad motor vehicles with a gross vehicle weight rating of more than 14,000 pounds. pounds that are considered low use.(b) The state board shall adopt rules and regulations to implement this section.(c) For the purposes of this section, “low use” means a vehicle determined through a process developed by the state board to be driven fewer than 1,000 miles per calendar year in California.